Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.140.005

Policy.

It is the policy of the state to encourage basic and applied scientific research by the state's research universities. The creation of knowledge is a core mission of the state's research universities, and research provides teaching and learning opportunities for students and faculty. State-of-the-art facilities for research by research universities serve to attract the most capable students and faculty to the state and research grants from public and private institutions throughout the world. The application of such research stimulates investment and employment within Washington and the strengthening of our tax base. In order to finance research facilities, the state's research universities often use federal, state, private, and university resources and therefore require the authority to enter into financing arrangements that leverage funding sources and reduce the costs of such complex facilities to the state.

[ 2002 c 151 s 1.]